Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.16.040

Precincts—Boundaries may be altered.

The county legislative authority of each county in the state shall divide the county into election precincts and establish the boundaries of the precincts.

(1) Precinct boundaries may be altered at any time as long as sufficient time exists prior to a given election for the necessary procedural steps to be honored. Except as permitted under subsection (3) of this section, no precinct changes may be made during the period starting seven days prior to the first day for candidates to file for the primary election and ending with the day of the general election.

(2) The county legislative authority may establish by ordinance a limitation on the maximum number of active registered voters in each precinct within its jurisdiction. The number may be less than the number established by law, but in no case may the number exceed one thousand five hundred active registered voters.

(3) The county auditor shall temporarily adjust precinct boundaries when a city or town annexes unincorporated territory to the city or town, or whenever unincorporated territory is incorporated as a city or town. The adjustment must be made as soon as possible after the approval of the annexation or incorporation. The temporary adjustment must be limited to the minimum changes necessary to accommodate the addition of the territory to the city or town, or to establish the eligible voters within the boundaries of the new city or town, and remains in effect only until precinct boundary modifications reflecting the annexation or incorporation are adopted by the county legislative authority.

[ 2023 c 394 s 8. Prior: 2011 c 349 s 5; 2011 c 10 s 26; 2004 c 266 s 10; 2003 c 111 s 404; 1999 c 158 s 3; 1994 c 57 s 3; 1986 c 167 s 2; 1980 c 107 s 3; prior: 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 4; 1977 ex.s. c 128 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129 s 3; 1967 ex.s. c 109 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.04.040; prior: (i) 1921 c 178 s 1, part; 1915 c 11 s 1, part; 1907 c 130 s 1, part; 1889 p 402 s 7, part; Code 1881 s 3067, part; 1865 p 30 s 1, part; RRS s 5171, part. (ii) 1907 c 130 s 2, part; 1889 p 408 s 21, part; RRS s 5278, part. (iii) Code 1881 s 2679; 1854 p 65 s 4, part; No RRS. Formerly RCW 29.04.040.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Severability—1994 c 57: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1994 c 57 s 55.]

Effective date—1994 c 57: "Sections 1 through 3, 7, 10 through 12, 21, 22, 25, 27, 28, 31 through 34, 37 through 40, 42, 44 through 52, and 54 of this act take effect January 1, 1995." [ 1994 c 57 s 56.]

Severability—1986 c 167: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1986 c 167 s 26.]

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 361: "This 1977 amendatory act shall take effect January 1, 1978." [ 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 113.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 361: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 361 s 112.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 128: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 ex.s. c 128 s 6.]

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 129: See notes following RCW 29A.76.040.

"Precinct" defined: RCW 29A.04.121.